Missouri, session 2026, HB2087.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 82, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 82.921, to read as follows:
82.921. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Balloon", an inflatable, flexible bag made from latex, rubber, mylar, or
other materials, designed to be inflated with air or gas, such as helium;
(2) "City", a city not within a county;
(3) "Intentional release", the act of knowingly and deliberately releasing one or
more balloons into the atmosphere, regardless of intent or purpose;
(4) "Person", an individual, business, corporation, nonprofit organization,
government entity, group, or combination of such individuals or entities.
2. (1) No person shall intentionally release or cause to be intentionally released
any balloon into the atmosphere on private or public property within the boundaries of
a city.
(2) No person shall sponsor, organize, or promote an event that includes the
intentional release of balloons into the atmosphere on private or public property within
the boundaries of a city.
3. This section shall not apply to:
(1) Balloons released indoors, fully contained within a building or structure;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2087 2
(2) Scientific or meteorological research projects conducted by government
agencies, universities, or scientific institutions using balloons approved by the United
States Environmental Protection Agency or the Federal Aviation Administration;
(3) Hot air balloons that are fully recovered after flight; or
(4) Balloons used in military, rescue, or emergency operations.
4. (1) A person who violates this section shall be subject to a civil fine for each
balloon intentionally released equal to:
(a) One hundred dollars per balloon for a first offense;
(b) Two hundred fifty dollars per balloon for a second offense; and
(c) Five hundred dollars per balloon for a third or subsequent offense.
(2) If a person who violates this section is a business or similar entity that
promotes or sponsors balloon release events, such person may be subject to an
additional civil fine of two thousand five hundred dollars per event.
(3) (a) At the discretion of the court, a person who violates this section may be
required to perform community service in addition to or in lieu of the imposition of a
civil fine.
(b) Community service performed under this section shall be related to
environmental conservation including, but not limited to, litter cleanup.
5. (1) A city's environmental services department or a substantially similar
entity may enforce the provisions of this section.
(2) A city's department of public safety, or a substantially similar entity, and
police department may issue citations for violations of this section.
(3) A resident of a city may report a violation of this section to:
(a) Any city department or substantially similar entity established for providing
citizen services; or
(b) Any environmental hotline established by the city or the city's police
department for reporting violations of this section.
(4) A city may collaborate with environmental organizations and community
groups to assist with monitoring and reporting violations of this section.
✔